Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 628.13, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 628.13. A. 1. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, in cooperation with the State Board of Education, shall
actively encourage the concurrent enrollment in college or
university courses of eligible high school students on high school
campuses, on college and university campuses and via online courses.
2. The State Regents and State Board shall establish concurrent
enrollment requirements with an emphasis on determining course
readiness and take all necessary actions to ensure the availability
Req. No. 15071 Page 1

of c oncurrent enrollment opportunities to students in all Oklahoma
high schools.
B. The State Board of Education in cooperation with the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall prepare
promotional materials explaining the requirements, features and
opportunities of concurrent enrollment and shall ensure that the
independent school districts distribute the materials to each
student prior to enrollment for each year of high school.
C. No institution of The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education shall deny enrollment in any course to any otherwise
eligible high school student, or student of at least thirteen (13)
years of age who is receiving high-school-level instruction at home,
who meets the requirements of concurrent enrollment, nor shall any
independent school district prohibit any student who meets the
requirements of concurrent enrollment from participating.
D. 1. Each high school senior who meets the eligibility
requirements for concurrent enrollment shall be entitled to receive
a tuition waiver equivalent to the amount of resident tuition for a
maximum of eighteen (18) credit hours in their senior year. The
cost of tuition waivers provided to public school students pursuant
to this section shall be covered by the participating student's
school district.
2. Subject to the high school senior concurrent enrollment
program being fully funded, each Each high school junior who meets
Req. No. 15071 Page 2

the eligibility requirements for concurrent enrollment shall be
entitled to receive a tuition waiver equivalent to the amount of
resident tuition for a maximum of nine (9) credit hours in their
junior year, subject to the availability of school district funds.
3. Tuition waivers provided pursuant to this section shall be
granted without any limitation on the number of waivers granted in
any year other than the amount of district funds available for the
program and the number of eligible applicants.
4. Any public school student who receives a tuition waiver
pursuant to this section and withdraws from a concurrent enrollment
course after the withdrawal deadline shall reimburse the school
district fifty percent (50%) of the course tuition costs.
E. When a student earns college credit through concurrent
enrollment, school districts shall provide academic credit for any
concurrently enrolled higher education courses that are correlated
with the academic credit awarded by the institution of higher
education. Academic credit shall only be transcripted as elective
credit if there is no correlation between the concurrent enrollment
higher education course and a course provided by the school
district.
F. On or before December 1 of each year, the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education shall issue an annual report on the
concurrent enrollment program implemented pursuant to this section.

Req. No. 15071 Page 3

The annual report shall include but not be limited to the following
information:
1. The number of students participating in concurrent
enrollment;
2. The number of students participating in concurrent
enrollment who received tuition waivers pursuant to subsection D of
this section;
3. The high school graduation rate of students described in
paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection; and
4. The number of students described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of
this subsection who earned an associate's degree or a bachelor's
degree at an institution of higher education.
The annual report shall be posted on the websites of the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and the State Department
of Education.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15071 SW 12/19/25


Req. No. 15071 Page 4